Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adjustable rate mortgage" or "ARM" means a payment option ARM or a hybrid ARM (commonly known as a 2/28 or 3/27 loan).

(2) "Application" means the same as in Regulation X, Real Estate Settlement Procedures, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, as used in an application for a residential mortgage loan.

(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a person subject to this chapter in an effort to seek information about obtaining a residential mortgage loan, regardless of whether that person actually obtains such a loan.

(4) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.

(5) "Director" means the director of the department of financial institutions.

(6) "Financial institution" means commercial banks and alien banks subject to regulation under Title 30A RCW, savings banks subject to regulation under Title 32 RCW, savings associations subject to regulation under Title 33 RCW, credit unions subject to regulation under chapter 31.12 RCW, consumer loan companies subject to regulation under chapter 31.04 RCW, and mortgage brokers and lenders subject to regulation under chapter 19.146 RCW.

(7) "Fully indexed rate" means the index rate prevailing at the time a residential mortgage loan is made, plus the margin that will apply after the expiration of an introductory interest rate.

(8) "Mortgage lending process" means the process through which a person seeks or obtains a residential mortgage loan or residential mortgage loan modification including, but not limited to, solicitation, application, or origination; negotiation of terms; third-party provider services; underwriting; signing and closing; and funding of the loan. Documents involved in the mortgage lending process include, but shall not be limited to, uniform residential loan applications or other loan applications, appraisal reports, settlement statements, supporting personal documentation for loan applications such as W-2 forms, verifications of income and employment, bank statements, tax returns, payroll stubs, and any required disclosures.

(9) "Negative amortization" means an increase in the principal balance of a loan caused when the loan agreement allows the borrower to make payments less than the amount needed to pay all the interest that has accrued on the loan. The unpaid interest is added to the loan balance and becomes part of the principal.

(10) "Person" means individuals, partnerships, associations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts, corporations, and all other legal entities.

(11) "Residential mortgage loan" means an extension of credit secured by residential real property located in this state upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed, a single-family dwelling or multiple-family dwelling of four or less units. It does not include a reverse mortgage or a borrower credit transaction that is secured by rental property. It does not include a bridge loan. It does not include loans to individuals making or acquiring a residential mortgage loan solely with his or her own funds for his or her own investment. For purposes of this subsection, a "bridge loan" is any temporary loan, having a maturity of one year or less, for the purpose of acquisition or construction of a dwelling intended to become the borrower's principal dwelling.

(12) "Residential mortgage loan modification" means a change in one or more of a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions. Changes to a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions include, but are not limited to, forbearances; repayment plans; changes in interest rates, loan terms, or loan types; capitalizations of arrearages; or principal reductions.

(13) "The interagency guidance on nontraditional mortgage product risks" means the guidance document issued in September 2006 by the office of the comptroller of the currency, the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the office of thrift supervision, and the national credit union administration, and the guidance on nontraditional mortgage product risks released in November 2006 by the conference of state bank supervisors and the American association of residential mortgage regulators.

(14) "The statement on subprime mortgage lending" means the guidance document issued in June 2007 by the office of the comptroller of the currency, the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the office of thrift supervision, and the national credit union administration, and the statement on subprime mortgage lending released in July 2007 by the conference of state bank supervisors, the American association of residential mortgage regulators, and the national association of consumer credit administrators.

[ 2015 c 229 s 2; 2008 c 108 s 2.]